District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-343

Selection of depositories and investments.

Repealed.

Oct. 26, 1977, D.C. Law 2-32, § 4, 24 DCR 3725
Mar. 4, 1981, D.C. Law 3-128, § 10, 28 DCR 246
Apr. 8, 1992, D.C. Law 9-91, § 2(a), 39 DCR 1365
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Mar. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-56, § 2(a), 44 DCR 6933
1981 Ed., § 47-343.
1973 Ed., § 47-273.

Repeal of Law 9-11

Section 3 of D.C. Law 9-91 repealed the District of Columbia Depository Act of 1977 Temporary Amendment Act of 1991 (D.C. Law 9-11).

Inseverability of Law 9-91: Section 4 of D.C. Law 9-91 provided that if any provision of § 47-343(f) or § 47-344(f), as added by § 2 of the act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional, beyond the statutory authority of the Council of the District of Columbia, or otherwise invalid, then all provisions of §§ 47-343(e)-(f) and 47-344(e)-(f), as added by § 2 of the act, shall be deemed invalid.